Hawaii statutes.
§481B-14 Hotel or restaurant service
charge; hotel porterage service charge; disposition. (a) Any:

(1) Hotel or restaurant that applies a service charge
for the sale of food or beverage services; or

(2) Hotel that applies a service charge for porterage
services;

shall distribute the service charge directly to its
employees as tip income or clearly disclose to the purchaser of the services
that the service charge is being used to pay for costs or expenses other than
wages and tips of employees.

(b) As used in this section, unless the
context requires otherwise, "porterage" means the act of moving
luggage, bags, or parcels between a guest room and a lobby, front desk, or any
area with vehicular access at a hotel, hotel-condominium, or condominium-hotel,
as defined in section 486K-1. [L 2000, c 16, §2; am L 2015, c 137, §2]

Case Notes

This section is not preempted by the federal Fair
Labor Standards Act regulations; further, this section is not
unconstitutionally vague in violation of due process; moreover, this section
did not deny defendant hotel and resort employer due process because it did not
automatically transform the service charges in question into the property of
plaintiff hotel employees, who sought unpaid wages, because it permitted defendant
the option of disclosing to customers that the service charges would not be
paid to employees. 810 F. Supp. 2d 1145 (2011).

This section requires hotels and restaurants to pay
service charges to employees as tip income if they do not disclose their
contrary practice to customers; to the extent that the legislative history of
this section is relevant to the question of whether employees may sue for
unpaid wages under §388-6 based on violations of this section, that legislative
history, as interpreted by the Hawaii supreme court, provides support for the
idea that employees may do so. 810 F. Supp. 2d 1145 (2011).

Defendant resort's motion to dismiss plaintiff resort
employees' claim that defendant violated this section, brought under §480-2(a),
granted where plaintiffs' allegations did not show the nature of the
competition or demonstrate that plaintiffs have suffered an antitrust injury;
Hawaii's requirement that a plaintiff assert the nature of the competition was
designed to serve the same purpose as the federal requirement that a plaintiff
assert an antitrust injury. 818 F. Supp. 2d 1240 (2010).

Plaintiff resort employees' claim, brought under
§480-2(a), that defendant resort violated this section was not preempted by
§301 of the Labor Management Relations Act, 29 U.S.C. §185(a), because the
claim regarding this section was a statutory claim that was independent from
any obligations created under the collective bargaining agreement (agreement)
between defendant and plaintiffs; further, resolution of the claim did not
require interpretation of the agreement and there was no clear and explicit
waiver of plaintiffs' rights under this section in the agreement. 818 F. Supp.
2d 1240 (2010).

Plaintiff resort employees' claim that defendant
resort violated this section was not preempted by the National Labor Relations
Act pursuant to the Machinists doctrine because it is not the type of statute
that the Machinists doctrine was intended to preempt as it does not present the
types of concerns enunciated by the United States Supreme Court in Machinists;
further, this section had no comparable effect on the bargaining process;
moreover, this section provides a minimum protection for employees as well as
consumer protection. 818 F. Supp. 2d 1240 (2010).

Plaintiff hotel employees' claim, brought pursuant to
§§480-2 and 481B-4 and this section, was not preempted by §301 of the Labor
Management Relations Act, 29 U.S.C. §185(a) because plaintiffs were not
enforcing a right conferred only by the collective bargaining agreement
(agreement), but rather an independent right conferred by state law; resolution
of plaintiffs' state law claim was not dependent on any provision contained in
the agreement and did not require interpretation of the agreement. 835 F.
Supp. 2d 914 (2011).

Plaintiffs' claim pursuant to §§481B-4 and 480-2 and this
section dismissed because (1) they had not alleged harm to competition; (2)
merely alleging competition between hotels that result in lower prices did not
give rise to antitrust injury; (3) no authority to support plaintiffs
"competing" with defendant for tips, that there was a competitive
market that defendant was a part of for tips, or that defendant's actions
regarding service charges had a negative effect on that market; and (4)
statements that their injuries were "inextricably intertwined" with
defendant's acts did not establish that defendant caused any negative effect on
competition. 835 F. Supp. 2d 914 (2011).

The legislative history of this section, as interpreted by
the Hawaii supreme court in Davis, allows plaintiff hotel employees to recover
for unpaid service charges imposed without the requisite disclosure set forth
in this section, through a claim brought pursuant to §§388-6, 388-10, and
388-11. 835 F. Supp. 2d 914 (2011).

This section was a law of general applicability which creates
a minimum standard related to service charges for the entire hotel and
restaurant industry; consequently, this section did not encourage or discourage
employees in the promotion of their interest collectively, and was not the type
of statute that the U.S. Supreme Court in Machinists ("Machinists
doctrine") intended to preempt. 835 F. Supp. 2d 914 (2011).

Employees are "any persons" within the meaning of
§§480-1 and 480-2(e) and are within the category of plaintiffs who have
standing to bring a claim under §480-2(e) for a violation of this section;
however, based on the allegations contained in employees' amended complaint,
employees did not sufficiently allege the "nature of the competition"
to bring a claim for damages against employer under §§480-2(e) and 480-13(a)
for a violation of this section. 122 H. 423, 228 P.3d 303 (2010).

When a hotel or restaurant applying a service charge for the
sale of food or beverage services allegedly violates this section by: (1) not
distributing the full service charge directly to its employees as "tip
income" (in other words, as "wages and tips of employees"); and
(2) failing to disclose this practice to the purchaser of the services, the
employees may bring an action under §§388-6, 388-10, and 388-11 to enforce the
employees' rights and seek remedies. 130 H. 130, 306 P.3d 175 (2013).

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next